New York, session 2025-2026, S4830.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 378 of the public author- 2 ities law is designated subdivision 1 and a new subdivision 2 is added 3 to read as follows: 4 2. (a) The authority is hereby authorized and directed to issue annual 5 short distance commuter permits which shall provide for travel at no 6 charge between interchanges in permit areas. For purposes of this subdi- 7 vision, the term "permit area" shall mean the following set of inter- 8 changes: thirty-four-A, thirty-five, thirty-six, thirty-seven, thirty- 9 eight and thirty-nine. Such permits shall be valid only for travel 10 within the permit area. The authority may restrict the use of such 11 permit to peak commuter hours. 12 (b) If, upon the completion of an audit conducted by a certified 13 public accountant selected by the authority, the authority can demon- 14 strate that the issuance of permits as authorized in paragraph (a) of 15 this subdivision for use during peak commuter hours causes a significant 16 loss of revenue to the authority, the authority is authorized, pursuant 17 to a resolution of the board, to offer such permits at a discount of the 18 cash cost per mile; provided, however, that, prior to such board resol- 19 ution, the authority shall hold at least one public hearing in the 20 permit area, at a time and location which will, to the extent practica- 21 ble, maximize the participation of the general public. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00807-02-5 S. 4830--A 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 2 it shall have become a law and shall expire December 31, 2030 when upon 3 such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. The 4 thruway authority shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary 5 for the implementation of this act on or before such effective date.